Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-506
Relation of operating agreement, this act, and Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section and subject to sections 21-507 and 21-508, the operating agreement of a series limited liability company governs:

(1) the internal affairs of a protected series, including:

(A) relations among any associated members of the protected series;

(B) relations among the protected series and:

(i) any associated member;

(ii) the protected-series manager; or

(iii) any protected-series transferee;

(C) relations between any associated member and:

(i) the protected-series manager; or

(ii) any protected-series transferee;

(D) the rights and duties of a protected-series manager;

(E) governance decisions affecting the activities and affairs of the protected series and the conduct of those activities and affairs; and

(F) procedures and conditions for becoming an associated member or protected-series transferee;

(2) relations among the protected series, the company, and any other protected series of the company;

(3) relations between:

(A) the protected series, its protected-series manager, any associated member of the protected series, or any protected-series transferee of the protected series; and

(B) a person in the person’s capacity as:

(i) a member of the company which is not an associated member of the protected series;

(ii) a protected-series transferee or protected-series manager of another protected series; or

(iii) a transferee of the company.

(b) If the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act restricts the power of an operating agreement to affect a matter, the restriction applies to a matter under the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act in accordance with section 21-508.

(c) If law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act imposes a prohibition, limitation, requirement, condition, obligation, liability, or other restriction on a limited liability company, a member, manager, or other agent of the company, or a transferee of the company, except as otherwise provided in law of this state other than the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act, the restriction applies in accordance with section 21-508.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in section 21-507, if the operating agreement of a series limited liability company does not provide for a matter described in subsection (a) of this section in a manner permitted by the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act, the matter is determined in accordance with the following rules:

(1) To the extent the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act addresses the matter, the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act governs.

(2) To the extent the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act does not address the matter, the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act governs the matter in accordance with section 21-508.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 7.
January 1, 2021